Tennessee, session 114, HB1975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 11, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
49-11-1001. Short title.
This part is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Career Readiness
Enhancement Act."
49-11-1002. Part definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Career readiness tools" means digital platforms and assessments
that provide:
(A) Personalized career exploration based on student interests,
skills, and local labor market data, aligned with the United States
department of labor's O*NET framework or a successor framework for an
occupational information program operated by the United States.
department of labor;
HB1975
011867
- 1 -

(B) Stackable credentials in essential soft skills, employability
skills, and digital literacy skills, recognized by national workforce councils;
and
(C) Integration with work-based learning opportunities to connect
students with career pathways;
(2) "Department" means the department of education;
(3) "High school" means a public school or public charter school that
serves students in any of the grades eleven and twelve (11-12); and
(4) "Work-based learning" means structured learning experiences that
connect classroom instruction to real-world work environments.
49-11-1003. Integration into career and technical education programs.
(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each high school in this state
shall integrate career readiness tools into at least one (1) career and technical education
(CTE) course offered to students in grades eleven (11) and twelve (12).
(b) The career readiness tools that are integrated pursuant to subsection (a)
must enable students to earn nationally recognized credentials in essential soft skills,
employability skills, and digital literacy skills at no cost to the students.
(c) Prior to integrating career readiness tools into a CTE course pursuant to
subsection (a), each LEA of a high school and public charter school that is a high school
shall obtain approval for the career readiness tools from the department. The
department shall approve the career readiness tools if the department finds that the
career readiness tools align with this state's career readiness opportunity program and
the United States department of labor's O*NET framework or a successor framework for
an occupational information program operated by the United States department of labor.
49-11-1004. Student Incentives.
- 2 - 011867

(a) A student who successfully completes an assessment associated with career
readiness tools and earns a credential in essential soft skills, employability skills, or
digital literacy skills is eligible to receive up to one (1) elective credit per credential, not to
exceed a total of three (3) elective credits, toward high school graduation requirements
as set by the state board of education pursuant to § 49-6-6001.
(b) The department shall establish a micro-grant program, funded through state
appropriations or existing federal grants, to provide a stipend of up to one hundred
dollars ($100) to each student who earns three (3) stackable credentials offered through
the career readiness tools. The state board of education shall promulgate rules to
establish and administer the micro-grant program in accordance with the Uniform
Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
49-11-1005. Teacher training and support.
The department shall provide professional development programs for career and
technical (CTE) educators and school counselors on the use of career readiness tools
for career exploration, skill development, and credential attainment. The professional
development programs developed pursuant to this section must include modules on
integrating career readiness tools into classroom instruction and work-based learning
experiences.
49-11-1006. Employer partnerships.
(a) An LEA of a high school or public charter school governing body that is a
high school may partner with local businesses and industries to promote credentials
earned through career readiness tools pursuant to this part as a hiring criterion.
(b)
- 3 - 011867

(1) The department shall establish a pilot program for at least ten (10)
school districts or public charter schools to integrate career readiness tools into
work-based learning experiences in the 2027-2028 school year.
(2) The pilot program must include mechanisms for employer feedback to
validate the relevance of credentials to workforce needs.
(3) The department shall report findings from the pilot program based on
employer feedback to the general assembly by July 1, 2029.
(4) The state board of education shall promulgate rules to establish and
administer the pilot program in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in Title 4, Chapter 5.
49-11-1007. Accountability and reporting.
Beginning July 1, 2027, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall collect
and report to the general assembly data on the number of students completing
credentials through career readiness tools for the immediately preceding school year,
disaggregated by school district, student demographics, and credential type.
SECTION 2. The state board of education shall promulgate rules to effectuate this act.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act,
compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 4. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
- 4 - 011867

SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2026-2027 school year and subsequent school years.
- 5 - 011867